Florida, session 2026, HB1361.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (3) of
section 119.07, Florida Statutes, to read:
119.07 Inspection and copying of records; photographing
public records; identification required; fees; exemptions.—
(3)
(e) Any person requesting to inspect or copy a public
record relating to a law enforcement officer as defined in s.
943.10(1) must provide the custodian of public records with a
valid driver license or identification card issued by this state
or another state. The custodian of public records must retain a
copy of such license or identification card with such request.
This paragraph does not apply to a law enforcement officer
acting in his or her official capacity.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1361-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1361 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1361-00